apertium-moe.moe.twoc
Alphabet

  %[%-p1%]:0 %[%-p2%]:0 %[%-p3%]:0 %[%-pindef%]:0 %[%-aa%]:0 %[%-nn%]:0 %[%-poss%]:0
  %[%+p1%]:0 %[%+p2%]:0 %[%+p3%]:0 %[%+pindef%]:0 %[%+aa%]:0 %[%+nn%]:0 %[%+poss%]:0

;

Rules

"Remove paths without matching suffix feature"
Fx:0 /<= _ ;
   except
       _ :* Fy:0 ;
   where Fx in ( %[%-p1%] %[%-p2%] %[%-p3%] %[%-pindef%] )
         Fy in ( %[%+p1%] %[%+p2%] %[%+p3%] %[%+pindef%] )
   matched ;

"Remove paths without matching prefix feature"
Fx:0 /<= _ ;
   except
       Fy:0 :* _ ;
   where Fy in ( %[%-p1%] %[%-p2%] %[%-p3%] %[%-pindef%] )
         Fx in ( %[%+p1%] %[%+p2%] %[%+p3%] %[%+pindef%] )
matched ;

"Remove paths without matching prefix feature"
Fx:0 /<= _ ;
   except
       Fy:0 :* _ ;
   where Fy in ( %[%-aa%] %[%-nn%] )
         Fx in ( %[%+aa%] %[%+nn%] )
matched ;

"Remove paths without matching prefix feature"
Fx:0 /<= _ ;
   except
       Fy:0 :* _ ;
   where Fy in ( %[%-poss%] )
	 Fx in ( %[%+poss%] )
matched ;
